Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 232.102A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. Family interactions shall continue regardless of a parentâs failure to comply with the requirements of a court order or the department , provided there is no finding by a court or the department that such interaction would be detrimental to the child unless a court finds that substantial evidence exists that the family interactions, whether House File 367, p. 2 supervised or unsupervised, would pose a serious risk of physical or emotional harm to the child . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 367, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor